Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1197.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 2, 3(c) and (g), 4(b) and (c), 7(a) and (b), 8(a) and (b), 11, 12(a), 13(b)(4) and 14 of the act of January 28, 1988 (P.L.24, No.11), known as the Private Academic Schools Act, are amended to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Annual." Twelve months from the date of initial licensure."Board." The State Board of Private Academic Schools.1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Office." The Office of Elementary and Secondary Education within the Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Online school." A school with at least one office located in this Commonwealth which uses technology in order to provide a significant portion of its curriculum and to deliver a significant portion of instruction to its students through the Internet or other electronic means and which shall not include a cyber charter school as provided under Article XVII-A of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949."Premises." Any grounds or facilities utilized by a school for the purposes of providing instruction or in the case of an online school any office space or facilities from which instruction will be transmitted or from which administrative support is offered."Private academic school" or "school." A school maintained, or classes conducted, for the purpose of offering instruction for a consideration, profit or tuition to five or more pupils at one and the same time, or to 25 or more pupils during any school year, the purpose of which is to educate an individual generally or specially or to prepare an individual for more advanced study, and shall include all schools engaged in such education, including online schools, except private trade schools, private business schools, private correspondence schools, private music schools, private dance schools, private art schools, private dramatic art schools, private schools of charm or poise, private driver training schools or any type of private school which is nonacademic in character.20250HB1197PN1346 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Secretary." The Secretary of Education of the Commonwealth.Section 3. State Board of Private Academic Schools.* * *(c) Administrative support.--Administrative support for the board shall be provided by the [department] office in accordance with section 214 of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929. The [department] office shall periodically consult with the board regarding its administrative needs.* * *(g) Documents.--Certificates of licensure and other official documents approved by the board shall be issued by the [department] office.Section 4. Powers and duties of board.* * *(b) Disposition of student records.--The board shall require every applicant for initial licensure to provide a written statement describing arrangements for disposition of student records in the event of closure. It shall be the duty of the board and the [department] office to assist in the execution of the arrangements when necessary.(c) Enforcement by [department] office.--The regulations promulgated by the board shall be enforced by the [department] office. The [department] office may submit to individual experts for review, programs and courses and financial statements proposed or offered by a school.Section 7. Application for license.(a) General rule.--Before any license is issued to a private academic school, a verified application shall be made, in writing, to the board on a form prepared and furnished by the 20250HB1197PN1346 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 [department] office.(b) Application contents.--The application shall require a statement showing:(1) The title or name and address of the school or, in the case of an online school, the school offices, grades and classes, together with the name of the owners and controlling officers.(2) The specific fields of instruction which will be offered and the purposes of such instruction.(3) [The] Any place where instruction will be given[.] or, in the case of an online school, from which instruction will be transmitted or from which administrative support is offered.(4) A specific listing of the equipment and instructional materials available for instruction in the school.(5) The maximum enrollment to be accommodated at the school.(6) The qualifications of teachers, professional staff and director.(7) Financial resources available to equip and maintain the school.(8) An agreement to abide by reasonable service and business ethics prescribed by the board.(9) Any additional information the board may deem necessary to enable it to determine the adequacy of the program of instruction and related matters.An application must be completed for board consideration.* * *Section 8. Issuance and renewal of license.20250HB1197PN1346 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (a) General rule.--The [department] office shall issue an original license to the applicant if the board finds that the application and the school for which a license is sought comply with the provisions of this act and with the rules and regulations promulgated under this act.(b) Duration and renewal.--Each original school license issued shall be effective from the date of issue until the same date of the month of original issue the following year and shall be renewed annually thereafter on a form prepared and furnished by the [department] office.* * *Section 11. Directory of private academic schools.The [department] office shall maintain a list of private academic schools which shall be available to the public.Section 12. Requirements for licensure and operation.(a) Inspection.--No private academic school may be granted a license or permitted to continue to operate under a granted license unless it permits the board and its representatives to inspect the school or classes or, in the case of an online school, any office space or facility from which instruction will be transmitted or from which administrative support is offered and makes available to the board, at any time when requested to do so, full information pertaining to the operation of the school.* * *Section 13. Enforcement, refusal, suspension or revocation of license.* * *(b) Refusal to issue, suspension of and revocation of license.--The board shall have the power to refuse to issue, 20250HB1197PN1346 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 suspend or revoke a license if it finds that:* * *(4) The applicant or licensee has failed or refused to permit the board or its representatives to inspect the school or classes or, in the case of an online school, any office space or facility from which instruction will be transmitted or from which administrative support is offered or has failed or refused to make available to the board, at any time when requested to do so, full information pertaining to any or all items of information contained in an application for license or pertaining to the operation of the private academic school.* * *Section 14. Promulgation of rules and regulations.(a) Rules and regulations generally.--The board shall promulgate rules and regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. The rules and regulations of the State Board of Private Academic Schools in force on the effective date of this act, and not countermanded by this act, shall remain in effect until repealed or amended by the board, but not for a period of more than one year.(b) Online schools.--(1) The board shall promulgate rules and regulations and establish policies, principles and standards necessary to carry out the purposes of this act as they relate to online schools and which:(i) Address the unique provision of instruction and services to students by online schools.(ii) Provide for any additional requirements or exemptions as may be required to accommodate the ability 20250HB1197PN1346 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 of online schools to provide instruction and student services.(2) The rules, regulations, policies, principles and standards shall take effect within 18 months of the effective date of this paragraph.(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the board may not issue a license to an online school until the rules and regulations, policies, principles and standards required by paragraph (1) are in effect.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1197PN1346 - 7 - 12345678910